Utah statutes.
63J-4-601.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Coordinator" means the public lands policy coordinator appointed in this part.

(2)  "Office" means the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office created by this part.

(3)  "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, local district, special service district, school district, interlocal cooperation agreement entity, or any administrative subunit of them.

(4)  "State planning coordinator" means the person appointed under Subsection 63J-4-202(1)(a)(ii).

